District of Columbia statutes.
9-401.07

Repayments from Permit Fund.

Repayments from the Permit Fund to the appropriation for assessment and permit work shall be credited to the appropriation for the fiscal year in which the repayment is made.

History

Mar. 2, 1907, 34 Stat. 1127, ch. 2510

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-610.
1973 Ed., § 7-609.